Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5044.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1178b. (1) Subject to subsection (2), by not later than
July 1, 2027, the board of a school district or intermediate school
district or board of directors of a public school academy shall
develop and adopt a policy that allows a student who is enrolled in
the school district, intermediate school district, or public school
academy and who has a prescription, recommendation, or order from a
private health care specialist for medically necessary applied
behavior analysis services to receive the services when the student
is in a school setting in compliance with other applicable state
CRM H02027'25 (H-3) 7dpric


laws and federal laws, including, but not limited to, the specified
federal statutes. The policy must address how a student described
in this subsection receives medically necessary applied behavior
analysis services when the student is in a school setting in
compliance with other applicable state laws and federal laws,
including, but not limited to, the specified federal statutes. Each
school operated by a school district, an intermediate school
district, or a public school academy shall immediately implement
the policy that is developed and adopted by the board of the school
district or intermediate school district or board of directors of
the public school academy under this subsection.
(2) The policy described in subsection (1) must, at a minimum,
do at least all of the following:
(a) Include a requirement that the parent or legal guardian of
each student enrolled in the school district, intermediate school
district, or public school academy receive a notice that states
that the specified federal statutes provide rights and protections
to students to access medically necessary applied behavior analysis
services required by the student for the student to have meaningful
access to the benefits of a public education or to attend school
without risks to the student's health or safety due to the
student's disabling medical condition.
(b) Address the process through which a private health care
specialist may do any of the following as required under the
specified federal statutes:
(i) Observe the student in the school setting.
(ii) Collaborate with instructional personnel and other school
personnel as necessary to ensure the student receives medically
necessary applied behavior analysis services in the school setting.
CRM H02027'25 (H-3) 7dpric


(iii) Provide medically necessary applied behavior analysis
services in the school setting.
(c) Include a requirement that the parent or legal guardian of
each student enrolled in the school district, intermediate school
district, or public school academy receive a notice informing the
parent or legal guardian of any right under state law or federal
law to appeal the decision of the board of the school district or
intermediate school district or board of directors of the public
school academy concerning access to medically necessary applied
behavior analysis services in the school setting.
(d) Include a requirement that when a student or the student's
parent or legal guardian requests that the student receive access
to medically necessary applied behavior analysis services in the
school setting, school personnel designated by the principal or
other chief administrator of the student's school must meet with
the student, the student's parent or legal guardian, and any
representatives or health care personnel designated by the student
or the student's parent or legal guardian not later than 30 days
after submission of the request to determine how and when the
requested medically necessary applied behavior analysis services
will be accommodated. The student's school must allow the requested
medically necessary applied behavior analysis services to be
provided unless it would impose a fundamental alteration or an
undue burden on the school under the specified federal statutes.
(3) The board of a school district or intermediate school
district or board of directors of a public school academy shall
make the policy described in subsection (1) publicly available on
its website and shall, on request, make the policy available to
each parent or legal guardian of a student who is enrolled in the
CRM H02027'25 (H-3) 7dpric


school district, intermediate school district, or public school
academy.
(4) Subject to the family educational rights and privacy act
of 1974, 20 USC 1232g, and the health insurance portability and
accountability act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, by not later than
July 1, 2028, and by not later than July 1 of each year thereafter,
the board of a school district or intermediate school district or
board of directors of a public school academy shall compile and
provide to the department the total number of requests for
medically necessary applied behavior analysis services in the
school setting resulting from a policy described in subsection (1)
and whether each request was approved or denied and, if denied, the
rationale for the denial.
(5) Subject to the family educational rights and privacy act
of 1974, 20 USC 1232g, and the health insurance portability and
accountability act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, by not later than
January 1, 2029, and by not later than January 1 of each year
thereafter, the department shall make the information it receives
under subsection (4) available on the department's website and
shall report the information to the house and senate standing
committees on education.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "Medically necessary applied behavior analysis services"
means evidence-based therapeutic interventions, prescribed by a
private health care specialist and delivered according to an
individualized treatment plan based on a comprehensive behavioral
assessment, that are required to treat autism, to reduce
maladaptive behaviors, and to develop, maintain, or restore
functional skills, the absence of which substantially interfere
CRM H02027'25 (H-3) 7dpric


with a student's ability to successfully access the educational
environment. Medically necessary applied behavior analysis services
are not provided for custodial, educational, or recreational
purposes alone, but are intended to address clinically significant
needs of the individual.
(b) "Private health care specialist" means a behavior analyst,
an assistant behavior analyst, or a behavior technician as those
terms are defined in section 18251 of the public health code, 1978
PA 368, MCL 333.18251. Private health care specialist does not
include school paraprofessionals or any individual employed by or
contracted with a school district, intermediate school district, or
public school.
(c) "Specified federal statutes" means the following
provisions of federal law:
(i) Section 504 of title V of the rehabilitation act of 1973,
29 USC 794.
(ii) The Americans with disabilities act of 1990, Public Law
101-336.
Final Page
CRM H02027'25 (H-3) 7dpric